California, session 20252026, AB1909.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 38025 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38025. In accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 4000, a motor vehicle issued a plate or device pursuant to Section 38160 may be operated or driven upon a highway but only as follows:(a) On a two-lane highway, only to cross the highway at an angle of approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the roadway and at a place where a quick and safe crossing may be made, or only when the roadway is not maintained by snow removal equipment and is closed to motor vehicles that are subject to registration pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), or only to cross a highway in the manner specified in subdivision (b).(b) With respect to the crossing of a highway having more than two lanes, or a highway having limited access, a motor vehicle may cross a highway but only at a place designated by the Department of Transportation or local authorities with respect to a highway under their respective jurisdictions as a place where a motor vehicle, or specified types of motor vehicle, may cross a highway, and a vehicle shall cross the highway only at that designated place and only in a quick and safe manner.(c) The Department of Transportation and local authorities with respect to a highway under their respective jurisdictions may designate, by the erection of an appropriate sign of a type approved by the Department of Transportation, a place where a motor vehicle, or specified type of motor vehicle, may cross a highway having more than two lanes or having limited access.(d) A motor vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 may be towed upon a highway, but not driven, if the vehicle displays a plate or device issued pursuant to Section 38160.(e) A motorcycle identified pursuant to Section 38010 may be pushed upon a highway, but not ridden, if the motorcycle has displayed upon it a plate or device issued pursuant to Section 38160.(f) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may operate or drive an off-highway vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 upon a highway in an emergency response situation.(g) A first responder, as defined in Section 8562 of the Government Code, may operate or drive an off-highway vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 upon a highway to provide emergency response services or while performing official departmental duties.SECTION 1.Section 24.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:24.5.All civil process in actions brought against the director and the Department of Motor Vehicles and all subpoenas for the production of department records shall be served upon the director or the director’s appointed representatives at the department’s headquarters.